Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Highway Funding

§ 31-17-75.
Legislative intent regarding highway funding.

The intent of the Legislature is for the structuring of maturity schedules and escrow accounts which will allow the greatest amount of revenues to be used for current construction of highways, while retaining a sound program of retiring the refunding bonds in an economically feasible manner. It is the further intent that all funds available under any of the provisions of Chapter 478, Laws of 1978, shall be invested at all times when not needed to pay the expenses authorized under the provisions of Chapter 478, Laws of 1978, and to pay the principal of and the interest on any bonds payable under the provisions of Chapter 478, Laws of 1978, as they become due.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 476, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1978).

§ 31-17-77.
Restrictions on payment of implementation costs.

None of the costs involved in the implementation of the provisions of Chapter 478, Laws of 1978, shall be paid to any member or employee of the executive or legislative department of the State of Mississippi, either directly or indirectly, or to any firm, association, or corporation in which any member or employee of the executive or legislative department has a pecuniary interest; provided, however, commissions paid to banks and licensed securities dealers in the usual and ordinary course of business shall not be considered cost for the purposes of this section; provided, further, any such state employee or official may be reimbursed for his actual expenses. Any person, firm, association or corporation making or receiving such payments in violation of the provisions of this section shall be liable to the State of Mississippi for triple the amount of such payments.

The provisions of this section shall also apply to any person who was a member or employee of the executive or legislative department of the State of Mississippi at the time of the passage of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 478, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1978).